Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4407
Expiration; revocation.

(1) An advance mental health care directive, including an irrevocable advance mental health care directive, shall remain in effect until it expires according to its terms or until it is revoked by the principal, whichever is earlier.

(2) A principal may revoke the directive even if the principal is incapacitated unless the principal has made the directive irrevocable during periods of incapacity pursuant to subsection (3) of section 30-4405.

(3) A principal with capacity or a principal without capacity who did not make the directive irrevocable during periods of incapacity may revoke the directive by:

(a) A written statement revoking the directive; or

(b) A subsequent directive that revokes the original directive. If the subsequent directive does not revoke the original directive in its entirety, only inconsistent provisions in the original directive are revoked.

(4) When a principal with capacity consents to treatment that is different than the treatment requested in the directive or refuses treatment that the principal requested in the directive, this consent or refusal does not revoke the entire directive but is a waiver of the inconsistent provision.

Laws 2020, LB247, § 7.